Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-701
Revisor of Statutes; office created.

There is hereby created within the Legislative Council the office of Revisor of Statutes.

Laws 1945, c. 119, § 1, p. 392;

Laws 1967, c. 328, § 2, p. 869.

Legislature created the office of Revisor of Statutes to implement constitutional provision with respect to report of Judges of Supreme Court to Legislature of defects in Constitution and laws. Haffke v. State, 149 Neb. 83, 30 N.W.2d 462 (1948).